California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Repealed (in Sec. 65) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 66.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18999.2.

(a) (1) A grantee shall provide, or contract for, outreach, active case management, and advocacy services related to all of the following programs, as appropriate:

(A) The Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled (SSI/SSP).

(B) The federal Social Security Disability Insurance (SSDI) program.

(C) The Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants.

(D) Veterans benefits provided under federal law, including, but not limited to, disability compensation.

(E) Any disability benefits that are not identified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, that an individual may be eligible to receive.

(2) The outreach and case management services required by this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Receiving referrals.

(B) Conducting outreach, training, and technical assistance.

(C) Providing assessment and screening.

(D) Coordinating record retrieval and other necessary means of documenting disability.

(E) Coordinating the provision of health care, including behavioral health care, for clients, as appropriate.

(3) The advocacy services required by this subdivision, which may be provided though legal representation, shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Developing and filing competently prepared benefit applications, appeals, reconsiderations, reinstatements, and recertifications.

(B) Coordinating with federal and state offices regarding pending benefit applications, appeals, reconsiderations, reinstatements, and recertifications and advocating on behalf of the client.

(b) A grantee shall use screening tools to identify populations of individuals who are likely to be eligible for the programs listed in subdivision (a), in accordance with the following:

(1) The grantee shall give
 highest priority to either individuals who are chronically homeless or individuals who are homeless and rely most heavily on government-funded services.

(2) Other populations to be targeted by the program include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) General assistance or general relief applicants or recipients with disabilities or who are likely to have disabilities and who are homeless or at risk of
 homelessness, which may include individuals who have not yet received an eviction notice.

(B) Parents who receive CalWORKs or tribal Temporary Aid to Needy Families (tribal TANF) assistance, parents whose children receive CalWORKs or tribal TANF assistance, or children who are recipients of CalWORKs or tribal TANF assistance in families where one or more members has a disability or is likely to have a disability and that are homeless or at risk of homelessness, which may include individuals who have not yet received an eviction notice.

(C) Low-income individuals with disabilities or who are likely to have disabilities who can be
 diverted from, or who are being discharged from, jails or prisons and who are homeless or at risk of homelessness, which may include individuals who have not yet received an eviction notice.

(D) Low-income veterans with disabilities or who are likely to have disabilities who are homeless or at risk of homelessness, which may include individuals who have not yet received an eviction notice.

(E) Low-income individuals with disabilities or who are likely to have disabilities who
 are being discharged from hospitals, long-term care facilities, or rehabilitation facilities and who are homeless or at risk of
 homelessness, which may include individuals who have not yet received an eviction notice.

(c) (1) A grantee, as may be appropriate, may refer an individual to workforce development programs who is not likely to be eligible for the programs listed in subdivision (a) and who may benefit from workforce development programs.

(2) In consultation with an individual who has been served by the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program and considering the circumstances of the individual’s disabilities, a grantee may, upon approval or final denial of disability benefits, refer an individual who may benefit from workforce development programs to those programs.

(3) An individual’s participation in a workforce development program pursuant to this subdivision
 is voluntary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 89.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18999.4.

(a) (1) Pursuant to Section 18999.1, a grantee shall offer housing assistance to individuals described in subdivision (b) of Section 18999.2 and shall use funds received under this program to establish or expand programs that provide housing assistance, including interim housing, recuperative care, rental subsidies, or, only when necessary, shelters, for clients receiving services under Section 18999.2 during the clients’ application periods for disability benefits programs described in that section. The grantee shall make a reasonable effort to place a client who receives subsidies in housing that the client can sustain without a subsidy upon approval of disability benefits, or consider providing limited housing assistance until an alternative subsidy, affordable housing voucher, or other sustainable
 housing option is secured. Upon approval or denial of disability benefits, where needed, case management staff shall assist in developing a transition plan for housing support.

(2) A client’s participation in housing assistance programs or services is voluntary.

(b) To the extent authorized under federal law, a grantee, with the assistance of the department, shall seek reimbursement of funds used for housing assistance, general assistance, or general relief from the federal Commissioner of Social Security pursuant to an interim assistance reimbursement agreement authorized by Section 1631(g) of the federal Social Security Act, and shall expend funds received as reimbursement for housing assistance only on additional housing assistance for clients receiving services under this chapter.

(c) Beginning on July 1, 2025, the requirement to seek reimbursement of funds pursuant to subdivision (b) is waived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 35.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18999.6.

(a) A grantee shall report at least annually to the department on its funding of advocacy and outreach programs in the prior year and its use of state funding provided under this chapter, including, to the extent that data is available, all of the following:

(1) The number of clients served in each of the targeted populations described in subdivision (b) of Section 18999.2 and any other populations the grantee chose to target.

(2) The demographics of the clients served, including race or ethnicity,
 age, and gender.

(3) The number of applications for benefits, and type of benefits, filed with the assistance of the grantee.

(4) The number of applications approved initially, the number approved after reconsideration, the number approved after appeal, and the number not approved, including the average processing time from submission of applications while in the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program to final determination.

(5) For applications that were denied, the reason or reasons for denial.

(6) The number of clients who received subsidized housing during their enrollment in the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program.

(7) A description of how
 housing impacted the clients and the rates of completed applications or approval.

(8) The number of clients who received subsidized housing who maintained that housing during the disability benefits application period.

(9) The percentage of clients
 approved for disability benefits who retain permanent housing 6 and 12 months after the approval of disability benefits.

(10) The number of individuals eligible to be served by this program but who have not yet received services.

(11) Any additional data requirements established by the department after consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, tribes, and advocates for clients.

(b) The department shall annually inform the Legislature of the implementation progress of the program and make related data available on its internet website. Beginning in 2020, the department shall also submit an annual report, by February 1, to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, regarding the implementation of the program, including the information reported by participating grantees pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 91.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Homeless Multidisciplinary Personnel Team [18999.8. - 18999.82.]

18999.8.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a county may establish a homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team with the goal of facilitating the expedited identification, assessment, and linkage of homeless individuals to housing and supportive services within that county and to allow provider agencies and members of the personnel team to share confidential information for the purpose of coordinating housing and supportive services to ensure continuity of care.

(2) If a city within a county that has established a homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team pursuant to this chapter requests to participate in that team, the county shall allow for
 the participation of appropriate city personnel, as determined by the county, unless the county determines that participation by the city would hinder compliance with the requirements and obligations set forth in this chapter or would otherwise conflict with the county’s goals and objectives.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Homeless” means any recorded instance of an adult or family self-identifying as homeless within the most recent 12 months, or any element contained in service utilization records indicating that an adult or family experienced homelessness within the most recent 12 months.

(2) “Homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team”
 means any team of two or more persons who are trained in the identification and treatment of homeless adults and families, and who are qualified to provide a broad range of services related to homelessness. The team may include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Mental health and substance abuse services personnel and practitioners or other trained counseling personnel.

(B) Police officers, probation officers, or other law enforcement agents.

(C) Legal counsel for the adult or family representing them in a criminal matter.

(D) Medical personnel with sufficient training to provide health services.

(E) Social services workers with experience or training in the provision of services to homeless adults or families or funding and eligibility for services.

(F) Case managers or case coordinators responsible for referral, linkage, or coordination of care and services provided to adults or families.

(G) Veterans services providers and counselors.

(H) Domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(I) Any public or private school teacher, administrative officer, or certified pupil personnel employee.

(J) Housing or homeless services provider agencies and designated personnel.

(3) “Homeless services provider agency” means any governmental or other agency that has, as one of its purposes, the identification, assessment, and linkage of housing or supportive services to homeless adults or families. The homeless services provider agencies serving adults or families that may share information under this section include, but are not limited to, all of the following entities or service agencies:

(A) Social services.

(B) Health services.

(C) Mental health services.

(D) Substance abuse services.

(E) Probation.

(F) Law enforcement.

(G) Legal counsel for the adult or family representing them in a criminal matter.

(H) Veterans services and counseling.

(I) Domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(J) Schools.

(K) Homeless services.

(L) Housing.

(c) (1) Members of a homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team engaged in the identification, assessment, and linkage of housing and supportive services to homeless adults or families may disclose to, and exchange with, one another, information and writings that relate to any information that may be designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the identification, reduction, or elimination of homelessness or the provision of services. Any discussion relative to the disclosure or exchange of the information or writings during a team meeting is confidential and, notwithstanding any other law, testimony concerning that discussion is not admissible in any criminal, civil, or juvenile court proceeding.

(2) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section may occur telephonically and electronically if there is adequate verification of the identity of the homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel who are involved in that disclosure or exchange of information.

(3) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section shall not be made to anyone other than members of the homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team, and those qualified to receive information as set forth in subdivision (d).

(4) Representatives of domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, shall obtain an individual’s informed consent, in
 accordance with all applicable state and federal confidentiality laws, before disclosing confidential information about that individual to another team member as specified in this section.

(d) The homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team may designate persons qualified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) to be a member of the team for a particular case. A person designated as a team member pursuant to this subdivision may receive and disclose relevant information and records, subject to the confidentiality provisions of subdivision (f).

(e) (1) The sharing of information permitted under subdivision (c) shall be governed by protocols developed in each county describing how and what information may be shared by the homeless adult and family
 multidisciplinary personnel team to ensure that confidential information gathered by the team is not disclosed in violation of state or federal law. A copy of the protocols shall be distributed to each participating agency and to persons in those agencies who participate in the homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team, and shall be posted on the county’s internet website on the homepage of the office of homelessness, social services department, or human services agency within 30 days of adoption. Each county shall provide a copy of its protocols to the State Department of Social Services. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the department to review or approve any homeless multidisciplinary personnel team county protocols that it receives.

(2) A protocol developed in a county pursuant to paragraph (1) shall
 include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The items of information or data elements that will be shared.

(B) The participating agencies.

(C) A description of how the information shared pursuant to this section will be used by the homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team only for the intended purposes specified in subdivision (a).

(D) The information retention schedule that participating agencies shall follow.

(E) A requirement that no confidential information or writings be disclosed to persons who are not members of the homeless adult and family multidisciplinary
 personnel team, except to the extent required or permitted under applicable law.

(F) A requirement that participating agencies develop uniform written policies and procedures that include security and privacy awareness training for employees who will have access to information pursuant to this protocol.

(G) A requirement that all persons who have access to information shared by participating agencies sign a confidentiality statement that includes, at a minimum, general use, security safeguards, acceptable use, and enforcement policies.

(H) A requirement that participating agencies employ security controls that meet applicable federal and state standards, including reasonable administrative, technical, and physical
 safeguards to ensure data confidentiality, integrity, and availability and to prevent unauthorized or inappropriate access, use, or disclosure.

(I) A requirement that participating agencies take reasonable steps to ensure information is complete, accurate, and up to date to the extent necessary for the agency’s intended purposes and that the information has not been altered or destroyed in an unauthorized manner.

(f) Every member of the homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team who receives information or records regarding adults and families in that member’s capacity as a member of the team shall be under the same privacy and confidentiality obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing the information or records.
 The information or records obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(g) This section shall not be construed to restrict guarantees of confidentiality provided under state or federal law.

(h) Information and records communicated or provided to the team members by all providers and agencies shall be deemed private and confidential and shall be protected from discovery and disclosure by all applicable statutory and common law protections. Existing civil and criminal penalties shall apply to the inappropriate disclosure of information held by the team members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (AB 728)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18999.81.

(a) A homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team established pursuant to Section 18999.8 in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Mateo, Santa Clara, and Ventura may additionally have the goal of facilitating the expedited identification, assessment, and linkage of individuals at risk of homelessness to housing and supportive services within that county, and the goal of facilitating the expedited prevention of homelessness for those individuals.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “individual at risk of homelessness” means an individual who is indigent or receiving or eligible to receive public
 benefits in the form of cash aid, and who meets both of the following conditions:

(1) The individual experiences either of the following:

(A) Is exiting, or exited within the most recent 12 months, a state-funded or locally funded detention or treatment setting, including, but not limited to, a jail, prison, health facility, mental health facility, or substance use disorder treatment program.

(B) Is aging out, or aged out within the most recent 12 months, of the child welfare system or the juvenile justice system.

(2) The individual presents with, or received services within the most recent 12 months for, significant health, mental health, or substance use issues.

(c) The homeless adult
 and family multidisciplinary personnel teams described in this section shall also include persons who are trained in the prevention of homelessness.

(d) (1) Members of a homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team engaged in the prevention of homelessness or linkage of housing and supportive services for individuals at risk of homelessness, may disclose to, and exchange with, one another, information and writings that relate to any information that may be designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the identification of individuals at risk of homelessness or the prevention of homelessness or the provision of services.

(2) (A) The multidisciplinary personnel team member who first establishes contact with an individual at risk of homelessness, as
 defined in subdivision (b), shall notify the individual that the individual’s confidential information may be shared for the purpose of coordinating housing and supportive services to ensure continuity of care and shall attempt to obtain the individual’s consent for that information sharing.

(B) For individuals at risk of homelessness, members of the multidisciplinary personnel team may share with other members of the team confidential information for either of the following purposes:

(i) Identifying individuals at risk of homelessness, unless and until the individual affirmatively opts out of having their information shared.

(ii) Coordinating housing and supportive services to ensure continuity of care for a period not to exceed 30 days from the time a team member first establishes contact with the individual, or
 unless and until the individual affirmatively opts out of having their information shared, whichever occurs first.

(e) The confidentiality and privacy provisions contained in Section 18999.8 apply to information or writings disclosed, exchanged, or acquired pursuant to this section, and that information and writings shall not be disclosed in violation of existing federal or state privacy laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   (AB 1948)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18999.82.

(a) The Counties of Yuba and Sutter may establish a joint homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team with the goal of facilitating the expedited identification, assessment, and linkage of homeless individuals to housing and supportive services within either of those counties and to allow provider agencies and members of the personnel team to share confidential information for the purpose of coordinating housing and supportive services to ensure continuity of care.

(b) A joint homeless adult and family multidisciplinary personnel team established pursuant to this section shall conform to all requirements and obligations of a homeless adult and family multidisciplinary
 personnel team established pursuant to Section
 18999.8.

(c) The Counties of Yuba and Sutter shall adopt a joint protocol to govern the sharing of information that is in full compliance with the requirements and obligations for protocols developed pursuant to Section 18999.8. A joint protocol adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be at least as restrictive of the sharing of confidential information as any protocol adopted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 18999.8 for the sharing of information by a team comprised solely of members of either county individually.

(d) If a city within the County of Yuba or Sutter requests to participate in a joint multidisciplinary personnel team established pursuant to this section, the counties shall allow for the participation of appropriate city personnel, as
 determined by the counties, unless the counties determine that participation by the city would hinder compliance with the requirements and obligations set forth in this chapter or would otherwise conflict with the counties’ goals and objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   (AB 2174)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20. Community Care Expansion Program [18999.97. - 18999.98.]

18999.97.

(a) The Community Care Expansion Program is hereby established. Under the program, qualified grantees shall administer projects for the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of property to be operated as residential adult and senior care facilities, or to promote the sustainability of existing licensed residential adult and senior care facilities through the provision of capitalized operating subsidy reserves.

(b) (1) The department may enter into an agreement with one or more entities to facilitate the grant awards. A contracting entity shall act as a third-party administrator to provide operational services under the contract with the department. The services may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Supporting the development of the notice of funding availability.

(B) Developing an online application portal.

(C) Executing contracts.

(D) Processing invoices and making grant payments.

(E) Providing technical assistance via webinars, learning collaboratives, application assistance, and other methods.

(F) Reporting.

(2) Funds appropriated for the purposes of this section shall be awarded, at the discretion of the department, to qualified grantees that include, but are not limited to, counties, tribes, or jointly applying counties and tribes.

(3) Qualified grantees may award grant funds to one or more subgrantees for projects consistent with the requirements of this chapter.

(c) Subject to an appropriation of funds in the annual Budget Act for the following purposes, the department shall award grants for one or both of the following as specified in the annual Budget Act:

(1) To preserve or expand capacity of residential adult and senior care facilities through the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of property.

(A) Qualified grantees may also use a portion of grant funds to establish capitalized operating subsidy reserves.

(B) Counties and tribes receiving funds under this paragraph shall provide matching funds or real
 property.

(C) The department, at its discretion, may award grants in a manner that takes into consideration the prioritization of qualified residents who are experiencing homelessness or who are at risk of homelessness.

(2) To provide capitalized operating subsidy reserves to existing licensed residential adult and senior care facilities that serve at least one qualified resident, in order to avoid the closure of facilities and to increase the acceptance of new qualified residents, consistent with Provision 19 of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Ch. 69, Stats. 2021).

(A) The department shall award grants in a manner that prioritizes preserving the placement of qualified residents currently residing within a licensed residential adult or senior care facility that is at risk of closure and facilities with
 the highest percentage of qualified residents.

(B) As a condition of accepting funds, facilities are required to prioritize applications from prospective qualified residents, including those who are currently or formerly homeless or who are at risk of homelessness.

(C) The department shall report to the Legislature at the midpoint of program implementation and within six months after program completion on outcome monitoring, the use of funds, and the impact on retention of current capacity and additional capacity as a result of receiving operating subsidies. The report shall include data on the capacity of facilities serving individuals with a serious mental illness.

(d) The department shall develop criteria for the program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The methodology and distribution of the funds awarded to qualified grantees under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c). The department shall consider the distribution of adult and senior care facilities in counties across the state, the share of the latest homeless point-in-time count across the counties, and the relative cost of construction, acquisition, and rehabilitation between counties. The department shall set aside 8 percent of funds for a competitive program for small counties with a population of less than 200,000, and shall redistribute any unexpended funds.

(2) The proportion of funds that may be expended on capitalized operating subsidy reserves pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(3) Allowable use of funds awarded under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c).

(4) Tracking and reporting procedures.

(e) “Qualified resident” for the purpose of this section means applicants or recipients of the Supplementary Security Income/State Supplemental Program (SSI/SSP) pursuant to Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), and applicants or recipients the Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI) pursuant to Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937), who need the care and supervision that is provided by the licensed facility that receives the grant. “Qualified resident” shall not include SSI/SSP or CAPI applicants or recipients who are receiving services through a regional center.

(f) “Capitalized operating subsidy reserve” for the purpose of this section means an interest bearing
 account maintained by the qualified grantee, the residential adult or senior care facility, or a third-party entity and created to cover potential or projected operating deficits on a facility that provides licensed residential care for at least the term of the reserve, as demonstrated by a deed restriction or, at the discretion of the department, a legally enforceable agreement. The department shall develop guidelines on the qualified grantees’ use of capitalized operating subsidy reserves to ensure safeguards for those reserves, based on use in other state programs.

(g) Funds awarded pursuant to this section shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, other funding available from existing local, state, or federal programs or grants with similar purposes.

(h) A qualified grantee or entity operating a program pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from any data entry or reporting requirements pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 8255) of Division
 8.

(i) Utilizing the funds appropriated for purposes of this section, the department shall, in consultation with legislative staff and relevant stakeholders, enter into a contract with an independent evaluation and research agency to evaluate the impacts of the program, collect data, and provide technical assistance.

(j) For purposes of implementing this section, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the following:

(1) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 11546 of the Government Code, from review or approval of any division of the Department of Technology, upon approval from the Department of Finance.

(5) From the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(k) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this chapter through all-county letters or similar instruction that shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(l) Any project that receives funds pursuant to this section shall be deemed consistent and in conformity with any applicable local plan, standard, or requirement, and any applicable coastal plan, local or otherwise, shall be allowed as a permitted use, within the zone in which the structure is located, shall not be subject to a conditional use permit, discretionary permit, or any other discretionary reviews or approvals, and shall be deemed as a ministerial action under Section 15268 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(m) The state shall be immune from any liability resulting from the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 68.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18999.98.

The term “low-rent housing project,” as defined in Section 1 of Article XXXIV of the California Constitution, does not apply to the development of an adult or senior care facility that meets any one of the following criteria:

(a) (1) The development is privately owned housing, receiving no ad valorem property tax exemption, other than exemptions granted pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, not fully reimbursed to all taxing entities; and (2) not more than 49 percent of the dwellings, apartments, or other living accommodations of the development may be occupied by persons of low income.

(b) The development is privately owned housing, is not exempt from
 ad valorem taxation by reason of any public ownership, and is not financed with direct long-term financing from a public body.

(c) The development is intended for owner-occupancy, which may include a limited equity housing cooperative as defined in Section 50076.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or cooperative or condominium ownership, rather than for rental-occupancy.

(d) The development consists of newly constructed, privately owned, one-to-four family dwellings not located on adjoining sites.

(e) The development consists of existing dwelling units leased by the state public body from the private owner of these dwelling units.

(f) The development consists of the rehabilitation, reconstruction, improvement or addition to, or replacement of, dwelling
 units of a previously existing low-rent housing project, or a project previously or currently occupied by lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) The development consists of the acquisition, rehabilitation, reconstruction, improvement, or any combination thereof, of a development which, prior to the date of the transaction to acquire, rehabilitate, reconstruct, improve, or any combination thereof, was subject to a contract for federal or state public body assistance for the purpose of providing affordable housing for low-income households and maintains, or enters into, a contract for federal or state public body assistance for the purpose of providing affordable housing for low-income households.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 696, Sec. 27.   (AB 172)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. STATE DEPARTMENT OF REHABILITATION [19000. - 19806.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [19000. - 19098.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. Powers and Duties [19000. - 19020.]

19000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) Work is a valuable and important activity, both for individuals and society, and fulfills the need of an individual to be productive, promotes independence, enhances self-esteem, and allows for participation in the mainstream of life.

(2) Disability is a natural part of human experience and in no way diminishes the capacity of individuals to live independently, enjoy self-determination, make choices, contribute to society, pursue meaningful careers, and enjoy inclusion and integration in the economic, political, social, cultural, and educational mainstream of society.

(3) As a group, individuals with disabilities experience staggering levels of unemployment and poverty.

(4) Increased employment of, and independent living for, individuals with disabilities can be achieved by providing individualized training, independent living services, educational and support services, and meaningful opportunities for employment in integrated work settings with reasonable accommodations.

(5) Individuals with disabilities, including individuals with the most significant disabilities, have demonstrated their ability to achieve gainful employment in integrated settings if appropriate services and supports
 are provided.

(6) The provision of vocational rehabilitation services can enable individuals with disabilities, including individuals with the most
 significant disabilities, to pursue meaningful careers by securing gainful employment commensurate with their abilities and capabilities.

(b) The purpose of this division is to assist the Department of Rehabilitation in operating comprehensive, coordinated, effective, efficient, and accountable programs of vocational rehabilitation and independent living that are designed to assess, plan, develop, and provide services for individuals with disabilities, particularly individuals with the most significant disabilities, consistent with their strengths, resources, priorities, concerns, abilities, and capabilities, so that these individuals may prepare for and engage in gainful employment and live more
 independently.

(c) The Department of Rehabilitation’s vocational rehabilitation and independent living programs shall be consistent with the national policy toward people with disabilities articulated in the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336) and the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended.

(d) It shall be the goal of the Department of Rehabilitation to provide individuals with disabilities with the tools necessary to do all of the following:

(1) Make informed choices and decisions.

(2) Maximize
 employment, independence, and economic and social self-sufficiency in the mainstream of society.

(3) Achieve equality of opportunity and inclusion and integration into all aspects of society.

(e) The Department of Rehabilitation’s vocational rehabilitation and independent living programs, projects, and activities shall be carried out in a manner consistent with the following principles:

(1) Respect for individual dignity, personal responsibility, self-determination, and pursuit of independent living and meaningful careers, based on informed choice of individuals with disabilities.

(2) Respect for the privacy, rights, and equal access of individuals with disabilities, including, but not limited to, the use of accessible formats.

(3) Individuals with disabilities, including individuals with the most significant disabilities, shall be generally presumed to be capable of engaging in gainful employment, and the provision of individualized vocational rehabilitation services can improve their ability to become gainfully employed.

(4) Promotion of independence, inclusion, integration, and full participation of individuals with disabilities.

(5) Individuals with disabilities shall be provided the opportunities to obtain competitive employment in integrated settings.

(6) Individuals with
 disabilities shall be active participants in their own rehabilitation programs, including, but not limited to, making meaningful and informed choices about the selection of their vocational goals and objectives and the vocational rehabilitation services they receive.

(7) Support for the involvement of a parent, a family member, a guardian, an advocate, or an authorized representative, if an individual with a disability requests, desires, or needs that support.
